Washington statutes.
RCW 4.80.020

When to be taken.

It shall not be necessary or proper to take or enter an exception to any ruling or decision mentioned in RCW 4.80.010, which is embodied in a written judgment, order or journal entry in the cause. But this section shall not apply to the report of a referee or commissioner, or to findings of fact or conclusions of law in a report or decision of a referee or commissioner, or in a decision of a court or judge upon a cause or part of a cause, either legal or equitable, tried without a jury.

[ 1893 c 60 s 2; RRS s 382.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 46.